District of Columbia statutes.
16-4605.03

Transitional provision.

A motion or other request for relief made in a child-custody proceeding or to enforce a child-custody determination which was commenced before April 27, 2001, is governed by the law in effect at the time the motion or other request was made.

History

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-293, § 2(d), 48 DCR 2214
Mar. 31, 2009, D.C. Law 17-378, § 2(c), (e), 56 DCR 1572
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 75(c), 59 DCR 6190

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 16-4604.02.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-378 redesignated this section and substituted “April 27, 2001” for “the effective date of this chapter”.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 made a stylistic change.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 402 of the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act (1997 Act).